Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2383.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "unconscionably excessive" in section 3 of the act of October 31, 2006 (P.L.1210, No.133), known as the Price Gouging Act, is amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Market emergency." An abnormal disruption of a market for petroleum products, including an actual or threatened shortage in the supply of petroleum products or an actual or threatened 123456789101112131415161718 increase in the price of petroleum products resulting from severe weather, convulsion of nature, supply manipulation, failure or shortage of electric power or other source of energy, strike, civil disorder, act of war, terrorist attack, national or local emergency or other extraordinary adverse circumstances."Petroleum product." A motor fuel, liquefied petroleum gas or fuel oil."Petroleum-related business." A producer, supplier, wholesaler, distributor or retail seller of a petroleum product.* * *"Unconscionably excessive." A price is unconscionably excessive when the amount charged represents a gross disparity between the price of the consumer goods or services and the price at which the consumer goods or services were sold or offered for sale within the chain of distribution in the usual course of business seven days immediately prior to the state of disaster emergency or market emergency.Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 4.1. Petroleum product price gouging prohibited.(a) Prohibition.--It shall be a violation of this act for a petroleum-related business to alter the price of a petroleum product or derivatives of a petroleum product more than once within a 24-hour period.(b) Market emergency.--A market emergency may be declared by the Governor and shall continue for 30 days or until terminated by the Governor. The Governor may extend the market emergency for additional 30-day periods.(c) Violation of market emergency.--It shall be an unfair and deceptive act and practice in commerce and a violation of this act for a petroleum-related business, during a market 20260HB2383PN3197 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 emergency declared by the Governor under subsection (b), to sell or offer to sell a petroleum product or heating fuel product for an amount that represents an unconscionably excessive price.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2383PN3197 - 3 - 1234